Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4517.
People of the State of Michigan enact: TITLE An act to provide for the broadcast of information concerning a child abduction or a missing child by radio and television stations; and to prescribe the content of the information broadcast. Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the âchild abduction and missing child broadcast actâ. Sec. 2. A radio or television station that receives information concerning a child abduction or a report of a missing child from the department of state police under the Michigan Amber alert act, 2002 PA 712, MCL 28.751 to 28.755, may broadcast that information in any manner designed to assist in the location of the abducted or missing child or apprehension of any suspect, including, but not limited to, through social media. Sec. 5. A radio or television station that accurately broadcasts information concerning a child abduction or a missing child obtained from the department of state police under the Michigan Amber alert act, 2002 PA 712, MCL 28.751 to 28.755, is immune from any liability based on the broadcast of that information. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4518 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor